DI-120

DIAGNOSTICS - SUB FUEL TANK SYSTEM

DI3MF-03

DTC 22 Both Fuel Pump Simultaneous Operation
Malfunction (*)

*: Fuel Tank Changeover Switch OFF

CIRCU

IT DESCRIPTION

Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI-108.

(b) Voltage of FPM 1 terminalis high
(c) Voltage of FPM2 terminal is high

DTC No. DTC Detecting ltem Trouble Area
Conditions (a), (b) and (c) continue:
(a) Fuel tank changeover switch OFF  Shortin sub fuel tank forcing driving relay circuit
22 (Voltage of FPMS terminal is low) « Sub fueltank forcing driving relay

« Shortin sub fuel pump circuit (+B short)

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI-108.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1

Checkvoltage between terminal FPM2 of engine ECU connector and body
ground (See page DI-116, step 2).

@

ox )

Repair and replace harness and connector.

Check sub fuel tank forcing driving relay (See page FI-52).
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place sub fueltankforcingdrivingrelay.
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3 | Check voltage between terminal FPR2 of engine ECU connector and body

ground.
START  Fuel Tank Changeover | PREPARATION:
Switch is OFF (@ Remove the glove compartment door.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch to START.
|IZIIZIIZIEIIZIIZIIZII]I]IIIIZII]D‘%T]DDDDDDE\{EDDDDDDDDDD (¢) Fuel tank changeover switch is OFF.
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CHECK:
\‘%W Measure voltage between terminal FPR2 of engine ECU con-

/V\ nector and body ground, 4 seconds or more after starting the
I W FPR2 (+) | engine.
- A05863 %

Voltage: 9 - 14V

NG> Go to step 4.

OK
~_—

Check and repair harness and connector between sub fuel pump and sub fuel tank forcing
driving relay (+B short circuit) (See page IN-19).

4 | Check for short in harness and connector between sub fuel tank forcing driving
relay and engine ECU (See page IN-19).

@

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace.

1FZ-FE ENGINE SUP (RM619E)



